Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE A. DRAINAGE DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 6613. CAMERON COUNTY DRAINAGE DISTRICT NO. 3

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 6613.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the board of directors of the district.

(2) "Director" means a member of the board.

(3) "District" means the Cameron County Drainage District No. 3.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 6613.002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a drainage district created as a conservation and reclamation district under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 6613.003. FINDINGS OF BENEFIT AND PUBLIC PURPOSE. (a) The conversion of the district into a conservation and reclamation district under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution:

(1) is feasible, practicable, and needed;

(2) will be a public benefit and a public utility; and

(3) will benefit all land and property included in the district.

(b) All property in the district is benefited, and no property benefited is not included in the district.

(c) No land is included in the district except land that will be benefited.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 6613.004. DISTRICT TERRITORY. The district is composed of the territory described by Section 2, Chapter 45, Acts of the 41st Legislature, Regular Session, 1929, as that territory may have been modified under:

(1) Subchapter J, Chapter 49, Water Code; or

(2) other law.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 6613.051. COMPOSITION OF BOARD. The board consists of three directors.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 6613.052. COMPENSATION OF DIRECTORS. (a) A director shall receive for the director's services not more than $5 per day for the time the director is actually engaged in the work of the district, which shall be set by order of the commissioners court.

(b) In all areas of conflict with Subsection (a) of this section, Section 49.060, Water Code, takes precedence.

(c) A director's compensation may be increased as authorized by Section 49.060, Water Code, by resolution adopted by the board in accordance with Subsection (e) of that section on or after September 1, 1995.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 6613.101. GENERAL POWERS. The district has the powers, functions, and privileges provided under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, and the general laws governing drainage districts.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 6613.102. CONTROL, CONSTRUCTION, AND REPAIR OF DISTRICT IMPROVEMENTS; CONTRACTS FOR NEW CONSTRUCTION. (a) The board may control and supervise the construction and maintenance of canals, drains, ditches, levees, and other improvements of the district and shall keep them in repair.

(b) The board may construct new improvements necessary for the drainage of land in the district.

(c) A contract for new construction may or may not be let on bids and contracts as provided by law, within the discretion of the board as may seem for the best interest of the district.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER D. FINANCIAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 6613.151. TAXES. The board shall annually impose taxes on all taxable property in the district:

(1) in an amount sufficient to pay the interest as it becomes due on district bonds and to create a sinking fund for the payment of the bonds at maturity; and

(2) to pay for the maintenance and operation of the district and necessary improvements to be made for the district.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 6613.152. DISTRICT FUNDS. (a) The interest and sinking fund consists of taxes collected for the fund. Money in the interest and sinking fund may be paid out only to:

(1) pay district bonds and satisfy and discharge interest on the bonds; and

(2) defray the expense of imposing a tax for the fund.

(b) The maintenance and improvement fund consists of money collected by assessment or other sources for:

(1) the maintenance of property owned or acquired by the district;

(2) necessary improvements to be made by the district; and

(3) the general purposes of the district.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2017.